Utah statutes.
78B-5-804.   Money deposited in court.
(1) (a)  Any person depositing money  in court, to be held in trust, shall pay
it to the court clerk.
(b)  The clerk shall deposit the money in a court trust fund or with the
county treasurer or city recorder to be held subject to the order of the
court.
(2)  The Judicial Council shall adopt rules governing the maintenance of court
trust funds and the disposition of interest earnings on those trust funds.
(3) (a)  Any interest earned on trust funds in the courts of record that is
not required to accrue to the litigants by Judicial Council rule or court
order shall be deposited in a restricted account.  Any interest earned on
trust funds in the courts not of record that is not required to accrue to the
litigants by Judicial Council rule or court order shall be deposited in the
general fund of the county or municipality.
(b)  The Legislature shall appropriate funds from  the restricted account of
the courts of record to the Judicial Council to:
(i)  offset costs to the courts for collection and maintenance of court trust
funds; and
(ii)  provide accounting and auditing of all court revenue and trust accounts.
